test/src/morphology/V-sisjkyny_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - сиськыны: # Verb MONO сиськыны 'eng /udm /fin' - full paradigm
     сиськыны+V+Inf: сиськыны
     сиськыны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: сиськисько
     сиськыны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: сиськиськод
     сиськыны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: сиське
     сиськыны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [сиськиськом, сиськиськомы]
     сиськыны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: сиськиськоды
     сиськыны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: сисько

     сиськыны+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Sg1: сиськиськы
     сиськыны+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Sg2: сиськиськы
     сиськыны+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Sg3: сиськы
     сиськыны+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl1: сиськиське
     сиськыны+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl2: сиськиське
     сиськыны+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl3: сисько

     сиськыны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1: сисько
     сиськыны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2: сиськод
     сиськыны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg3: сиськоз
     сиськыны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1: [сиськом, сиськомы]
     сиськыны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2: сиськоды
     сиськыны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl3: сиськозы
     сиськыны+V+Ind+Fut+ConNeg+Sg: сиськы
     сиськыны+V+Ind+Fut+ConNeg+Pl: сиське

     # TODO:
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtI+Sg1: ужай
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtI+Sg2: ужад
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtI+Sg3: ужаз
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtI+Pl1: [ужамы, ужам]
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtI+Pl2: ужады
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtI+Pl3: ужазы
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtI+ConNeg+Sg: ужа
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtI+ConNeg+Pl: ужалэ

     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Sg1: ужаськем
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Sg2: ужамед
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Sg3: ужам
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Pl1: ужаськеммы
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Pl2: ужаллямды
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Pl3: [ужаллямзы, ужаллям]

     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtII+ConNeg+Sg1: ужаськем
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtII+ConNeg+Sg2: ужамед
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtII+ConNeg+Sg3: ужам
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtII+ConNeg+Pl1: ужаськеммы
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtII+ConNeg+Pl2: ужаллямды
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtII+ConNeg+Pl3: [ужаллямзы, ужаллям]

     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Neg+Sg1: ужаськымтэе
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Neg+Sg2: ужамтэед
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Neg+Sg3: ужамтэ
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Neg+Pl1: ужаськымтэмы
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Neg+Pl2: ужамтэды
     # сиськыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Neg+Pl3: [ужаллямтэзы, ужаллямтэ]

     # сиськыны+V+Imprt+Sg2: ужа
     # сиськыны+V+Imprt+Pl2: ужалэ
     # сиськыны+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: ужа
     # сиськыны+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: ужалэ

     # сиськыны+V+Imprt+Sg3: ужалоз
     # сиськыны+V+Imprt+Pl3: ужалозы
     # сиськыны+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg3: ужа
     # сиськыны+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl3: ужалэ

     # сиськыны+V+Opt+Sg1: ужам
     # сиськыны+V+Opt+Sg2: ужад
     # сиськыны+V+Opt+Sg3: ужаз
     # сиськыны+V+Opt+Pl1: ужамы
     # сиськыны+V+Opt+Pl2: ужады
     # сиськыны+V+Opt+Pl3: ужазы
     # сиськыны+V+Opt+ConNeg+Sg: ужа
     # сиськыны+V+Opt+ConNeg+Pl: [ужалэ, ужа]

     # сиськыны+V+Cond+Sg1: ужасал
     # сиськыны+V+Cond+Sg2: [ужасал, ужасалыд]
     # сиськыны+V+Cond+Sg3: [ужасал, ужасалыз]
     # сиськыны+V+Cond+Pl1: ужасалмы
     # сиськыны+V+Cond+Pl2: ужасалды
     # сиськыны+V+Cond+Pl3: ужасалзы

     # сиськыны+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg1: ужасал
     # сиськыны+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg2: [ужасал, ужасалыд]
     # сиськыны+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg3: [ужасал, ужасалыз]
     # сиськыны+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: ужасалмы
     # сиськыны+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: ужасалды
     # сиськыны+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: ужасалзы

     # сиськыны+V+PrcPrfAdn: ужам
     # сиськыны+V+PrcPrfNeg: ужамтэ
     # сиськыны+V+PrcPrfPred: ужамын

     # сиськыны+V+PrcPrsPos: ужась
     # сиськыны+V+PrcPrsNeg: ужасьтэм

     # сиськыны+V+GerPos: ужаса
     # сиськыны+V+GerNeg: ужатэк
